Hawaii statutes.
§206E-7 Community development rules. (a)
The authority shall establish community development rules under chapter 91 on
health, safety, building, planning, zoning, and land use which, upon final
adoption of a community development plan, shall supersede all other
inconsistent ordinances and rules relating to the use, zoning, planning, and
development of land and construction thereon. Rules adopted under this section
shall follow existing law, rules, ordinances, and regulations as closely as is
consistent with standards meeting minimum requirements of good design, pleasant
amenities, health, safety, and coordinated development. The authority may, in
the community development plan or by a community development rule, provide that
lands within a community development district shall not be developed beyond
existing uses or that improvements thereon shall not be demolished or
substantially reconstructed, or provide other restrictions on the use of the
lands.

(b) Development rights under a master plan
permit and master plan development agreement issued and approved by the
authority are vested under the community development district rules in effect
at the time of initial approval by the authority and shall govern development
on lands subject to such permit and agreement. [L 1976, c 153, pt of §1; am L
2014, c 61, §7]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next